src/orth-kor.xfst
! ============================================================ !
! Program to translate text from KK to the Single Written form !
! ============================================================ !

! The program translates from Kernewek Kemmyn to the Single 
! Written Form. While waiting for that form, it translates to KD.


echo << The definitions >>

define Vow      [ a | e | i | o | u | y |
                  á | é | í | ó | ú | ý |
                  A | E | I | O | U | Y |
                  Á | É | Í | Ó | U | Ý | 
                  â | Ä ] ;
define FrontVow [ e | i | y | E | I | Y |
                  é | í | ý | É | Í | Ý ] ;
define BackVow  [ a | o | u | A | O | Y |
                  á | ó | ú | Á | Ó | Ú ] ;
define LightVow [ a | e | i | o | u | y |
                  A | E | I | O | U | Y ] ;
             
define Cns [ b | c | d | f | g | h | j | k | l | m | 
             n | p | q | r | s | t | v | w | x | z |
             B | C | D | F | G | H | J | K | L | M |
             N | P | Q | R | S | T | V | W | X | Z ] ;

define Syll Cns* Vow+ Cns* ;



echo << Rules >>

define wh       h w -> w h , H w -> W h , H W -> W H ;
define kw       k -> c , K -> C || _ [ w | W ] ;
define k2c      k -> c ,     K -> C ||  _ [ BackVow | l | r ] ;
define kk2ck    k k -> c k , K K -> C K ;
define ks2x     k s -> x ,   K S -> X ;
define LSyllCns l l -> l , L L -> L , m m -> m , M M -> M ,
                n n -> n , N N -> N , r r -> r , R R -> R || Syll LightVow _ .#. , _ Cns ;
define VghV     g h -> h || Vow _ Vow ;!#, Vow _ .#. ;
#define RghV     r g h -> r r , l g h -> l l || Vow  _ Vow ;
define oe2o     o e -> o o ; !|| leftrestr _ rightrestr ; ! Subject to restrictions!!
define ssh      s -> 0 || [S|s] _ h ;
define thdel  t h -> ’ || Syll Vow _ .#. ;



define lexical {kemmeres} -> {kemeres} ,
{dehow} -> {dyhow} ,
{bywnans} -> {bewnans} , 
{whoer} -> {whor} ,
{goer} -> {gor} ,
{noeth} -> {noth} ,
{Sesar} -> {Cæsar}
;




echo << Compiling... >>

read regex [ wh
.o. kw
!.o. k2c
.o. kk2ck
.o. ks2x
.o. LSyllCns 
!.o. yacc 
.o. VghV
!.o. rghV
!.o. oe2o
.o. ssh
.o. thdel
.o. lexical
] ;

invert net ;

!save ../bin/kk2swf.fst ;
